src/morphology/affixes/pronouns.lexc
!! !!!Pronoun inflection

!! Erzya pronouns inflect in many the same cases as regular
!! nouns.



! ============================= !
!  Person morphological lexica !
! ============================= !

LEXICON PRON-PERS-DAT
+Pron+Pers+Dat: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

!LEXICON Dat-NoArg
!Pron+Pers+Dat: POSSX4-END-DAT ;

LEXICON Ill-Pron
+Pron+Pers+Ill: OBL-PX-FOLLOWED-BY-END-OR-FOC ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM_KI !!Interr-Pers
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom:е WORD-END ; !!= @CODE@ кие:ки
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Hum+Sg+Nom: WORD-END ; 
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Hum+Pl+Nom:%>тЬ2 WORD-END ; 
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Hum: PRON-INTERR-HUM_KI-OBL ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-HUM_KI-OBL
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 WORD-END ;
+Abl:%>дО1 WORD-END ;
+Dat:%>нень WORD-END ;
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} WORD-END ;
+Gen:%>нь WORD-END ;
+Ill:%>с WORD-END ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Obj: PossPX1-NomSg ;
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Obj: PossPX1 ;
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Obj: PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE-OBL ;
+Pron+Interr+Sem/Obj: CLT/COP_SG ; !!= @CODE@ singular

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE-OBL
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 WORD-END ;
+Com:%>шка WORD-END ;
+Dat:%>нень WORD-END ;
+Ela:%>ст%{оэØ%} WORD-END ;
+Gen:%>нь WORD-END ;
+Ill:%>с WORD-END ;
+Ine:%>с%{оэØ%} WORD-END ;
+Prl:%>ва WORD-END ;
+Tra:%>кс WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-PL-NOM-INDEF
+Pron+Interr+Pl+Nom+Indef: WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-SG-NOM-DEF
+Pron+Interr+Sg+Nom+Def: WORD-END ;

LEXICON ADV-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-TRA
+Adv+Interr+Tra:%>кс WORD-END ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG1 !! мон:мо
+Pron+Pers+Sg1@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@:000@P.PossPx.Sg1@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Abl+NoPoss:нде K ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:нстеме K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Pron+Dem:нете _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG2 !! тон:то
+Pron+Pers+Sg2@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@:000@P.PossPx.Sg2@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Abl+NoPoss:нде K ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Refl+Abe+NoPoss:нстеме K ;
+Pron+Pers+Sg2+Pron+Dem:нете _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;

LEXICON PRON-PERS-SG3 !! сон:со
+Pron+Pers+Sg3@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@:000@P.PossPx.Sg3@@P.TNUM.SG@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL1 !! минь:ми
+Pron+Pers+Pl1@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@:000@P.PossPx.Pl1@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.1@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2 !! тынь:ты
+Pron+Pers+Pl2@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@:000@P.PossPx.Pl2@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.2@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL3 !! сынь:сы
+Pron+Pers+Pl3@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@:000@P.PossPx.Pl3@@P.TNUM.PL@@P.TPERS.3@ Pers_Pronouns1 ;
LEXICON IS_PRON-PERS-PL3-DAT !!= * @CODE@ сыненст
+Pron+Pers+Pl3+Dat: K ;
LEXICON PRON-REFL_E2S1 !!= @CODE@ !!эсь:эсь
+Pron+Refl: PersPron_Minsy-Obliq ;
+Pron+Refl+Adn: WORD-END ;
+Pron+Refl+Prl:%>ка PossPX1 ; 
+Pron+Refl+Prl+Prl:%>кава PossPX1 ; 

LEXICON PRON-PERS-PL2_IS-INTENSIVE
+Pron+Pers+Pl2+Refl+Nom: WORD-END ;

LEXICON Pers_Pronouns1
+Nom@D.TNUM.PL@:н@D.TNUM.PL@ PRON-PERS-SG-CONJ ;
+Nom0@D.TNUM.SG@:нь@D.TNUM.SG@ PRON-PERS-PL-CONJ ;
!2017-10-24+Intensive:нсь PersPron_Minsy ;

+Gen0@U.PossPx.Sg1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@:нь@U.PossPx.Sg1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen0@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нь@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Gen0@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нть0@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _KIT-Tenses1 ;

+Gen00@U.PossPx.Sg3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@:нзэ@U.PossPx.Sg3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen00@U.PossPx.Pl1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@:нек@U.PossPx.Pl1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen0@U.PossPx.Pl2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen00@U.PossPx.Pl3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.TNUM@:нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.TNUM@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;

!!myv_oahpa
!2014-04-04!+Gen+PxSg1@U.PossPx.Sg1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@:нь@U.PossPx.Sg1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
!2014-04-04!+Gen+NoPoss@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нь@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
!2014-04-04!+Err/Orth+Dial+Gen+PxSg2@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нть0@U.PossPx.Sg2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _KIT-Tenses1 ;

!2014-04-04!+Gen+PxSg30@U.PossPx.Sg3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@:нзэ@U.PossPx.Sg3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;
!2014-04-04!+Gen+PxPl10@U.PossPx.Pl1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@:нек@U.PossPx.Pl1@@N.TPERS.1@@C.TNUM@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
!2014-04-04!+Gen+PxPl2@U.PossPx.Pl2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@:нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@@N.TPERS.2@@C.TNUM@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
!2014-04-04!+Gen+PxPl30@U.PossPx.Pl3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.TNUM@:нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@@N.TPERS.3@@C.TNUM@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!PROBLEM 2009-09-16 why does nstY4 have the Y4

!+Refl+Gen+Pron:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нсе PersPron_Gen ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+Refl+Gen+Pron:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нси PersPron_Gen ;


!2! Pers_Pronouns1_es ;
!2!+Gen+Indef+Der/се+Pron+Dem:нсе CXPossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abe:%>нстеме PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Abl:%>нстеде PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Cmpr:%>нсешка PossPX1 ;
+Refl+Dat:%>нсте PossPX1 ;

+Gen+PxSg20@U.PossPx.Sg2@@C.TNUM@@N.TPERS.2@:%>нь@U.PossPx.Sg2@@C.TNUM@@N.TPERS.2@ _KAL-Tenses1 ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg3+Gen@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.TNUM@@N.TPERS.3@:%>нзо@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.TNUM@@N.TPERS.3@ _KUDO-Tenses1 ;

+Abl:%>нде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Abl:%>ндеде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Abl+Gen+Abl:%>нденде PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Dat:не PersPron_PossPX ;
+Ill:ньзэ  PersPron_PossPX ;
+Tra:нькс PersPron_PossPX ; 
!+Tra000@P.LV.ON@:нькс@P.LV.ON@ PersPron_PossPX ; 
+Tra+Err/Orth:нькс K ; 
+Tra+Tra00000@P.LV.ON@:ньксэкс@P.LV.ON@ PersPron_PossPX ; 

+Abl:%>нде PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Abe:%>нтеме PersPron_Oblique ;
+Cmpr:%>ньшка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ela:%>ньстэ PersPron_Oblique ;
+Ine:%>ньсэ PersPron_Oblique ; 
+Prl:%>ньга PersPron_Oblique ;

!
!
LEXICON PersPron_Minsy
+Nom: _OSH-Tenses1 ;
 PersPron_Minsy-Obliq ;

LEXICON PersPron_Minsy-Obliq
!< "@N.TPERS.1@@N.TPERS.2@@N.TPERS.3@@C.TNUM@"> PersPron_Gen ;
+Dat:%>те PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl+Abl:%>теде PersPron_PossPX ;
+Abl:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}де PersPron_PossPX ;
+Prl:%>Г2а PersPron_Oblique ;
+Cmpr:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}шка PersPron_Oblique ;
+Abe:%>втО1мО1 PersPron_Oblique ;
+Tra000@P.LV.ON@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}кс@P.LV.ON@ PersPron_PossPX ;
+Err/Orth+Tra00@P.LV.ON@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}кс@P.LV.ON@ K ;
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg1@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}м0@U.PossPx.Sg1@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg100@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нь@U.PossPx.Sg1@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg200@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}тЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg3000@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@@C.TPERS@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нз%{оэØ%}@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@@C.TPERS@ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl1000@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нО1к@U.PossPx.Pl1@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl200@U.PossPx.Pl2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl300@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}ст@U.PossPx.Pl3@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg20@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нтЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ K ;
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxPl30@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@ K ;

LEXICON PersPron_Gen
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg1@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}м0@U.PossPx.Sg1@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg100@U.PossPx.Sg1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нь@U.PossPx.Sg1@ _KAL-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg200@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}тЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxSg3000@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@@C.TPERS@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нз%{оэØ%}@U.PossPx.Sg3@@C.DNUM@@C.TNUM@@C.TPERS@ _KUDO-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl1000@U.PossPx.Pl1@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нО1к@U.PossPx.Pl1@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl200@U.PossPx.Pl2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нк@U.PossPx.Pl2@ _LAK-PersPronGen_CX ;
+Gen+PxPl300@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}ст@U.PossPx.Pl3@ _KIT-PersPronGen_CX ;
!!these just go onto the clitics
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxSg20@U.PossPx.Sg2@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нтЬ2@U.PossPx.Sg2@ K ;
+Gen+Err/Orth+Dial+PxPl30@U.PossPx.Pl3@:%>%{ОЕЭØ%}нст@U.PossPx.Pl3@ K ;
+Err/Orth+Dial+NoPoss: K ;
