src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
эйзэнзэ:эйз Ill-Pron  "" ;
мезе:мезе PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE  "mikä" ;
мезть:мӒ4зть PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-PL-NOM-INDEF  "mitä" ;
минь:ми PRON-PERS-PL1  "me" ;
мон:мо PRON-PERS-SG1  "minä" ;
сон:со PRON-PERS-SG3  "hän" ;
сынь:сы PRON-PERS-PL3  "he" ;
тон:то PRON-PERS-SG2  "sinä" ;
тынь:ты PRON-PERS-PL2  "te" ;
тынсь:тынсь PRON-PERS-PL2_IS-INTENSIVE  "te itse" ;
мейсь:мӒ4йсь PRON-INTERR-OBJ_MEZE_IS-SG-NOM-DEF  "mistä syystä" ;
эсь:эсь PRON-REFL_E2S1  "" ;
